Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20259-1207
Reports; violations; penalty.

Any authorized gaming operator that willfully fails, neglects, or refuses to make any report required by section 9-1205, or by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such section, or that knowingly makes any false statement in any such report, is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 431, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 45;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 24;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 21.